Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142F.101, is amended to read: 142F.101 deleted text begin ASSETdeleted text end new text begin INCOMEnew text end LIMITATIONS FOR SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM HOUSEHOLDS. deleted text begin Alldeleted text end new text begin The county or Tribal agency must determine eachnew text end Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) deleted text begin households must be determineddeleted text end new text begin householdnew text end eligible for the benefit discussed under section 256.029. new text begin Each new text end SNAP deleted text begin householdsdeleted text end new text begin householdnew text end must demonstrate that deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin itsnew text end gross income is equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the same family size.